src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON мс-п_b-то
+Det+Def+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom:-то # ;
! +Det+Def+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc:-то # ;
! +Det+Def+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ого́-то # ;
! +Det+Def+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ого́-то # ;
! +Det+Def+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>о́м-то # ;
! +Det+Def+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ому́-то # ;
! +Det+Def+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м-то # ;
+Det+Def+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>о́-то # ;
! +Det+Def+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>о́-то # ;
! +Det+Def+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ого́-то # ;
! +Det+Def+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>о́м-то # ;
! +Det+Def+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ому́-то # ;
! +Det+Def+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м-то # ;
+Det+Def+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>а́-то # ;
! +Det+Def+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>у́-то # ;
! +Det+Def+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>е́й-то # ;
! +Det+Def+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>е́й-то # ;
! +Det+Def+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>е́й-то # ;
! +Det+Def+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>е́й-то # ;
! +Det+Def+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Fac:%>е́ю-то # ;
! +Det+Def+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:%>ы́-то # ;
! +Det+Def+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы́-то # ;
! +Det+Def+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ы́х-то # ;
! +Det+Def+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:%>ы́х-то # ;
! +Det+Def+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:%>ы́х-то # ;
! +Det+Def+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:%>ы́м-то # ;
! +Det+Def+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:%>ы́ми-то # ;
+Pron+Def+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom:-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc:-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ого́-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ого́-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>о́м-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ому́-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м-то # ;
+Pron+Def+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>о́-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>о́-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ого́-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>о́м-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ому́-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м-то # ;
+Pron+Def+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>а́-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>у́-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>е́й-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>е́й-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>е́й-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>е́й-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Fac:%>е́ю-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:%>ы́-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы́-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ы́х-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:%>ы́х-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:%>ы́х-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:%>ы́м-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:%>ы́ми-то # ;

LEXICON мс-п_весь
+Det+All: весь ;
+Det+All: всё ;
+Det+All: вся ;
+Det+All: все_anim ;
! +Det+All+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:се́ # ;
+Pron+All: весь ;
+Pron+All: всё ;
+Pron+All: вся ;
+Pron+All: все_anim ;
! +Pron+All+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:се́ # ;

LEXICON мс_все
+Pron: все_anim ;

LEXICON мс_всё
+Pron: всё ;

LEXICON весь
+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom:е́сь # ;
! +Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc:е́сь # ;
! +Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:сего́ # ;
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:сего́ # ;
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc:сём # ;
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:сему́ # ;
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:се́м # ;

LEXICON всё
+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom:сё # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc:сё # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:сего́ # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc:сём # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:сему́ # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins:се́м # ;

LEXICON вся
+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom:ся́ # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc:сю́ # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen:се́й # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc:се́й # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat:се́й # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins:се́й # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Fac:се́ю # ;

! LEXICON все_anim
! +Pl+Nom:се́ # ;
! +Anim+Pl+Acc:се́х # ;
! +Pl+Gen:се́х # ;
! +Pl+Loc:се́х # ;
! +Pl+Dat:се́м # ;
! +Pl+Ins:се́ми # ;

LEXICON мс_этот
+Pron+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Nom:от # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:ого # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Gen:ого # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Loc:ом # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Dat:ому # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Ins:им # ;

LEXICON мс_это
+Pron+Dem+Neu+Inan+Sg+Nom:о # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Neu+Inan+Sg+Acc:о # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Neu+Inan+Sg+Gen:ого # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Neu+Inan+Sg+Loc:ом # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Neu+Inan+Sg+Dat:ому # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Neu+Inan+Sg+Ins:им # ;

! LEXICON мс_эти ! TODO CHECK FIX can this be inanimate too?
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Nom:и # ;
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:их # ;
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Gen:их # ;
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Loc:их # ;
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Dat:им # ;
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Ins:ими # ;

LEXICON мс_тот
+Pron+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Nom:о́т # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:ого́ # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Gen:ого́ # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Loc:о́м # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Dat:ому́ # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Ins:е́м # ;

LEXICON мс_то
+Pron+Dem+Neu+Inan+Sg+Nom:о́ # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Neu+Inan+Sg+Acc:о́ # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Neu+Inan+Sg+Gen:ого́ # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Neu+Inan+Sg+Loc:о́м # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Neu+Inan+Sg+Dat:ому́ # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Neu+Inan+Sg+Ins:е́м # ;

! LEXICON мс_те
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Nom:е́ # ;
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:е́х # ;
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Gen:е́х # ;
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Loc:е́х # ;
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Dat:е́м # ;
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Ins:е́ми # ;

LEXICON мс-п_один
+Det: один ;
+Pron: один ;

LEXICON один
+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: # ;
! +Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: # ;
! +Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ого́ # ;
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ого́ # ;
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>о́м # ;
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ому́ # ;
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>и́м # ;
+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>о́ # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>о́ # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ого́ # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>о́м # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ому́ # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>и́м # ;
+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>а́ # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>у́ # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>о́й # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>о́й # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>о́й # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>о́й # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Fac:%>о́ю # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:%>и́ # ;
! +MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>и́ # ;
! +MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>и́х # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:%>и́х # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:%>и́х # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:%>и́м # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:%>и́ми # ;

LEXICON мс-п_сам ! TODO Can сам be a pronoun?
+Det+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: # ;
! +Det+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: # ;
! +Det+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:ого́ # ;
! +Det+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:ого́ # ;
! +Det+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc:о́м # ;
! +Det+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:ому́ # ;
! +Det+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:и́м # ;
+Det+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom:о́ # ;
! +Det+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc:о́ # ;
! +Det+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:ого́ # ;
! +Det+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc:о́м # ;
! +Det+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:ому́ # ;
! +Det+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins:и́м # ;
+Det+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom:а́ # ;
! +Det+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc:у́ # ;
! +Det+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen:о́й # ;
! +Det+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc:о́й # ;
! +Det+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat:о́й # ;
! +Det+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins:о́й # ;
! +Det+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Fac:о́ю # ;
! +Det+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:и # ;
! +Det+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:и # ;
! +Det+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:и́х # ;
! +Det+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:и́х # ;
! +Det+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:и́х # ;
! +Det+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:и́м # ;
! +Det+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:и́ми # ;

LEXICON мс-п_сей
+Det+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom:е́й # ;
! +Det+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc:е́й # ;
! +Det+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:его́ # ;
! +Det+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:его́ # ;
! +Det+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc:ём # ;
! +Det+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:ему́ # ;
! +Det+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:и́м # ;
+Det+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom:ие́ # ;
! +Det+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc:ие́ # ;
! +Det+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:его́ # ;
! +Det+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc:ём # ;
! +Det+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:ему́ # ;
! +Det+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins:и́м # ;
+Det+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom:ия́ # ;
! +Det+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc:ию́ # ;
! +Det+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen:е́й # ;
! +Det+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc:е́й # ;
! +Det+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat:е́й # ;
! +Det+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins:е́й # ;
! +Det+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Fac:е́ю # ;
! +Det+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:ии́ # ;
! +Det+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:ии́ # ;
! +Det+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:и́х # ;
! +Det+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:и́х # ;
! +Det+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:и́х # ;
! +Det+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:и́м # ;
! +Det+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:и́ми # ;
+Pron+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom:е́й # ;
! +Pron+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc:е́й # ;
! +Pron+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:его́ # ;
! +Pron+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:его́ # ;
! +Pron+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc:ём # ;
! +Pron+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:ему́ # ;
! +Pron+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:и́м # ;
+Pron+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom:ие́ # ;
! +Pron+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc:ие́ # ;
! +Pron+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:его́ # ;
! +Pron+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc:ём # ;
! +Pron+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:ему́ # ;
! +Pron+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins:и́м # ;
+Pron+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom:ия́ # ;
! +Pron+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc:ию́ # ;
! +Pron+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen:е́й # ;
! +Pron+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc:е́й # ;
! +Pron+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat:е́й # ;
! +Pron+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins:е́й # ;
! +Pron+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Fac:е́ю # ;
! +Pron+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:ии́ # ;
! +Pron+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:ии́ # ;
! +Pron+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:и́х # ;
! +Pron+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:и́х # ;
! +Pron+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:и́х # ;
! +Pron+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:и́м # ;
! +Pron+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:и́ми # ;

LEXICON мс-п_тот
+Det+Dem+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom:о́т # ;
! +Det+Dem+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc:о́т # ;
! +Det+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:ого́ # ;
! +Det+Dem+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:ого́ # ;
! +Det+Dem+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc:о́м # ;
! +Det+Dem+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:ому́ # ;
! +Det+Dem+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:е́м # ;
+Det+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom:о́ # ;
! +Det+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc:о́ # ;
! +Det+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:ого́ # ;
! +Det+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc:о́м # ;
! +Det+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:ому́ # ;
! +Det+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins:е́м # ;
+Det+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom:а́ # ;
! +Det+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc:у́ # ;
! +Det+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen:о́й # ;
! +Det+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc:о́й # ;
! +Det+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat:о́й # ;
! +Det+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins:о́й # ;
! +Det+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Fac:о́ю # ;
! +Det+Dem+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:е́ # ;
! +Det+Dem+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:е́ # ;
! +Det+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:е́х # ;
! +Det+Dem+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:е́х # ;
! +Det+Dem+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:е́х # ;
! +Det+Dem+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:е́м # ;
! +Det+Dem+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:е́ми # ;
+Pron+Dem+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom:о́т # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc:о́т # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:ого́ # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:ого́ # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc:о́м # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:ому́ # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:е́м # ;
+Pron+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom:о́ # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc:о́ # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:ого́ # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc:о́м # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:ому́ # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins:е́м # ;
+Pron+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom:а́ # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc:у́ # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen:о́й # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc:о́й # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat:о́й # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins:о́й # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Fac:о́ю # ;
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:е́ # ;
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:е́ # ;
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:е́х # ;
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:е́х # ;
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:е́х # ;
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:е́м # ;
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:е́ми # ;
